Utah statutes.
26-2-26.   Certified copies of vital records -- Preparation by state and local registrars -- Evidentiary value.

(1)  The state registrar and local registrars authorized by the department under Section 26-2-21 may prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of vital records and certify their correctness.

(2)  Certified copies of the vital record, or authorized reproductions of the original, issued by either the state registrar or a designated local registrar are prima facie evidence in all courts of the state with like effect as the vital record.

